apertium-jta.jta.twol
"Dropping AAIrr2 if followed by T for Kaan/Kaanu"
%{AAIrr2%}:0 <=> %{K%}: _ :ண [ %{Pul%}: | %{UIrr2%}: ] %>: %{T%}: ;

"Dropping AAIrr2 if followed by T for Kaan/Kaanu"
%{UIrr2%}:0 <=> %{K%}: %{AAIrr2%}: :ண _ %>: %{T%}: ;
                _ %>: %{A%}: ;

! Vocative
"Vocative vowel rules"
%{VOW%}:ா <=> :Consonant ConsonantLeft: %{Pul%}: %>: _ ;

"Vocative vowel rules"
%{VOW%}:ீ <=> %{I%}: %>: _ ;

"Vocative vowel rules"
%{VOW%}:ூ <=> %{U%}: %>: _ ;

"Vocative vowel rules"
%{VOW%}:ே <=> %{E%}: %>: _ ;

"Vocative vowel rules"
%{VOW%}:ோ <=> %{O%}: %>: _ ;

"Vocative vowel rules"
%{VOW%}:ௗ <=> %{AU%}: %>: _ ;

"Dropping vowel"
%{I%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{VOW%}:ீ ;

"Dropping vowel"
%{E%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{VOW%}:ே ;

"Dropping vowel"
%{O%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{VOW%}:ோ ;

"Dropping vowel"
%{AU%}:0 <=> _ %>: %{VOW%}:ௗ ;

"Dropping consonant"
C:0 <=> :Consonant _ %{Pul%}: %>: %{VOW%}: ;
        where C in ConsonantLeft ;

! Resources:
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Starting_a_new_language_with_HFST#Enter_twol
! https://kitwiki.csc.fi/twiki/bin/view/KitWiki/HfstHome
! https://github.com/hfst/
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Twol
! https://wiki.apertium.org/wiki/Hfst
